Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION.new text end new text begin (a) The Sentencing Guidelines Commission shall increase the presumptive sentence durations for violations of Minnesota Statutes, sections 609.342, 609.343, 609.344, 609.345, 609.3451, 609.3453, and 609.3458 by 25 percent. new text end new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to violations of Minnesota Statutes, sections 609.342, subdivision 1a, paragraph (f); 609.343, subdivision 1a, paragraph (f); 609.344, subdivision 1a, paragraph (b) or (e); or 609.345, subdivision 1a, paragraph (b) or (e), if the offender is in a recent or current position of authority over the victim. new text end new text begin (c) The changes required in paragraph (a) must be implemented in the 2025 sentencing grid, be effective on August 1, 2025, and be applicable to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end